Massachusetts, session 194th, H3947.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 19A of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the eighth sentence the following sentence:- Except 
in the case of an emergency situation determined by the commissioner as requiring immediate 
action to prevent damage to the public health, the commissioner shall not act on such agreement 
between: (i) any company or companies organized, licensed or otherwise authorized to transact 
accident or health insurance under subsections (a) and (d) of clause sixth of section 47 pursuant 
to sections 108 and 110; (ii) a nonprofit hospital service corporation authorized pursuant to 
sections 5 and 6 of chapter 176A; (iii) a nonprofit medical service corporation authorized 
pursuant to section 4 of chapter 176B; (iv) a dental service corporation pursuant to sections 4, 6 
and 7 of chapter 176E; (v) an optometric service corporation pursuant to sections 4, 4A and 6 of 
chapter 176F; (vi) a health maintenance organization pursuant to section 16 of chapter 176G; 
(vii) a preferred provider arrangement authorized under chapter 176I; (viii) a health benefit plan 
pursuant to section 6 of chapter 176J; or (ix) a dental benefit insurance plan pursuant to section 2 

of 2 14 of chapter 176X unless: (A) such agreement and accompanying documentation required by the 
preceding sentence has been on file with the division for at least 60 days; (B) the attorney 
general, the center for health information and analysis, the health policy commission, the 
executive office of health and human services and the office of Medicaid have been provided 
copies of such agreement and accompanying documents and given reasonable opportunity to 
supply information and comment on such merger or consolidation; and (C) a public hearing has 
been held by the division on such merger or consolidation agreement when requested by the 
applicant, the attorney general, the center for health information and analysis, the health policy 
commission, the executive office of health and human services, the office of Medicaid or any 10 
taxpayers of the commonwealth.